Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1813
Authority; keep records and accounts; seal; certified copies.

The executive director, assistant executive director, or any other person designated by resolution of the authority shall keep records and accounts of all proceedings and financial dealings of the authority, shall be custodian of all books, documents, and papers filed with the authority, the minute book or journal of the authority, and its official seal, and shall be custodian of all funds of the authority. The executive director, assistant executive director, or other designated person may cause copies to be made of all minutes and other records and documents of the authority and may give certificates under the official seal of the authority to the effect that such copies are true copies, and all persons dealing with the authority may rely upon such certificates.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 13.